Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 5. Endorsements.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.400.
Types of endorsements.

An endorsement expands the boundaries of a licensed premises or the authorized activities of a licensed business.

Only the board may issue an endorsement. The board may issue only the endorsements authorized in AS

04.09.400

—

04.09.520

.

An endorsement is valid only in conjunction with a license. An endorsement may be transferred to another person only if the license for which the endorsement was issued is also transferred to that person. An endorsement expires if the licensed premises are relocated, the license expires, or the license is revoked.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, an endorsement is valid for the duration of the license as designated in AS

04.11.680

. The holder of the endorsement shall renew the endorsement biennially.

An application for an endorsement under AS

04.09.400

—

04.09.520

must

be made in writing on a form prescribed by the board; and

demonstrate that the holder of the license has authority over and will exercise control over conduct of the business in all areas of the licensed premises, including premises newly licensed by the endorsement.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.410.
Manufacturer sampling endorsement.

A manufacturer sampling endorsement authorizes the holder of a brewery manufacturer license, winery manufacturer license, or distillery manufacturer license to offer for consumption on the licensed premises at no charge a small sample of an alcoholic beverage produced by the manufacturer.

The biennial fee for a manufacturer sampling endorsement is $200.

A person serving a sample of an alcoholic beverage under this section must have a current alcohol server education card issued under AS

04.21.025(c)

. Only the license holder or an agent or employee of the license holder may serve a sample.

The holder of a manufacturer sampling endorsement may serve a total volume of samples to a person on a licensed premises each day that does not exceed

for the holder of a brewery manufacturer license,

12 ounces of beer;

six ounces of sake; or

the alcoholic equivalent of (A) or (B) of this paragraph;

for the holder of a winery manufacturer license,

six ounces of wine, mead, or cider containing 8.5 percent or more alcohol by volume;

12 ounces of mead or cider containing less than 8.5 percent alcohol by volume; or

the alcoholic equivalent of (A) or (B) of this paragraph;

for the holder of a distillery manufacturer license, 1.5 ounces of distilled spirits; the holder of the distillery manufacturer license may combine the holder’s distilled spirits under this paragraph with other ingredients that are not alcoholic beverages, including mixers, liquids, and garnishes.

A person who offers a sample of an alcoholic beverage for consumption on the licensed premises of a brewery, winery, or distillery without an endorsement under this section commits the offense of unendorsed sampling.

Unendorsed sampling is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $500.

The holder of a manufacturer sampling endorsement who fails to comply with the requirements of (c) or (d) of this section commits the offense of failure to comply with the terms of a manufacturer sampling endorsement.

Failure to comply with the terms of a manufacturer sampling endorsement is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.420.
Multiple fixed counter endorsement.

A multiple fixed counter endorsement authorizes the holder of a beverage dispensary license or a beverage dispensary tourism license to sell or serve alcoholic beverages on the licensed premises from multiple fixed counters.

The biennial fee for a multiple fixed counter endorsement is $200.

In addition to the fee under (b) of this section, the initial application fee for each fixed counter covered under the endorsement is $1,250.

An initial application for a multiple fixed counter endorsement must include an annotated drawing of the location of each fixed counter in the licensed premises.

A fixed counter at which alcoholic beverages are sold or served to the public for consumption covered under a multiple fixed counter endorsement must be a regularly maintained fixed counter or service bar that has plumbing connections to permanent plumbing. Multiple fixed counters must be located in the same building under the same contiguous licensed premises as set out in regulation, except as provided for the holder of a hotel or motel endorsement under AS

04.09.430

or a large resort endorsement under AS

04.09.440

. The board shall adopt regulations to implement this subsection.

The holder of a beverage dispensary license or a beverage dispensary tourism license who maintains multiple fixed counters without an endorsement under this section commits the offense of unendorsed service at multiple fixed counters.

The holder of a multiple fixed counter endorsement who fails to comply with the requirements of (e) of this section commits the offense of multiple fixed counter endorsement noncompliance.

Unendorsed service at multiple fixed counters is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $500.

Multiple fixed counter endorsement noncompliance is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.430.
Hotel or motel endorsement.

A hotel or motel endorsement authorizes the holder of a beverage dispensary license or a beverage dispensary tourism license that is a hotel, motel, resort, or similar business premises that caters to the traveling public as a substantial part of its business to sell or serve alcoholic beverages on the licensed premises, including in a dining room, banquet room, and other public areas approved by the board, and in guest rooms.

The biennial fee for a hotel or motel endorsement is $200.

The holder of a beverage dispensary license or a beverage dispensary tourism license that is a hotel, motel, resort, or similar business premises that caters to the traveling public as a substantial part of its business shall apply for a multiple fixed counter endorsement under AS

04.09.420

to sell or serve alcoholic beverages at a secondary location located in a building different than the licensed premises for the beverage dispensary license or a beverage dispensary tourism license if the different building

is located on the same property as, adjacent to, or attached to the originally licensed premises;

principally caters to guests of the hotel or motel; and

principally encourages the tourism trade at the hotel or motel.

The holder of a hotel or motel endorsement may stock alcoholic beverages in guest rooms, for sale and consumption only in the guest room. Alcoholic beverages stocked under this subsection must be stocked by an employee who is 21 years of age or older, may not be supplied or resupplied during hours that the sale of alcoholic beverages is prohibited as provided under AS

04.16.010(a)

and (d), and must be stored in a unit using a key or combination lock system within the guest room. A key lock system must be designed to prevent the removal of the key unless the unit is locked. Except for the licensee, or an agent or employee of the licensee, a key or combination enabling a person to obtain alcoholic beverages stocked in a guest room may be provided only to a guest who occupies the room and who is 21 years of age or older.

The holder of a hotel or motel endorsement shall exercise control over conduct of the business in all areas of the licensed premises.

The holder of a beverage dispensary license or a beverage dispensary tourism license who engages in activity under this section without an endorsement under this section commits the offense of unendorsed hotel or motel service.

The holder of a hotel or motel endorsement who fails to comply with the requirements of this section commits the offense of hotel or motel endorsement noncompliance.

Unendorsed hotel or motel service is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $500.

Hotel or motel endorsement noncompliance is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.440.
Large resort endorsement.

A large resort endorsement authorizes the holder of a beverage dispensary license or a beverage dispensary tourism license that is a large resort to sell or serve alcoholic beverages from multiple locations on the resort property to guests for consumption in areas on the site of the large resort, including a dining room, banquet room, guest room, open air venue, and ingress or egress route between those areas.

The biennial fee for a large resort endorsement is $200.

The holder of a large resort endorsement shall apply for a multiple fixed counter endorsement under AS

04.09.420

to sell or serve alcoholic beverages from multiple locations within the large resort’s property. The locations do not need to be located in the same building or on the same parcel, but must be within the boundary of the large resort, as that term is defined in (h) of this section.

The holder of a large resort endorsement may sell or serve alcoholic beverages only from locations on the site of the large resort.

For federal income tax purposes, the profit and loss from the licensed business conducted at locations on the resort under a large resort endorsement, other than guest rooms, must be combined or consolidated with the profit and loss from the licensed business conducted under the multiple fixed counter endorsement.

The holder of a large resort endorsement shall exercise control over conduct of the business in all areas of the licensed premises.

A holder of a beverage dispensary license with a large resort endorsement may stock alcoholic beverages in guest rooms, for sale and consumption only in the guest room. Alcoholic beverages stocked under this subsection must be stocked by an employee who is 21 years of age or older, may not be supplied or resupplied during hours that the sale of alcoholic beverages is prohibited as provided under AS

04.16.010(a)

and (d), and must be stored in a unit using a key or combination lock system within the guest room. A key lock system must be designed to prevent the removal of the key unless the unit is locked. Except for the licensee, or an agent or employee of the licensee, a key or combination enabling a person to obtain alcoholic beverages stocked in a guest room may be provided only to a guest who occupies the room and who is 21 years of age or older.

In this section, “large resort” means a resort that offers both outdoor recreational activities and overnight lodging to the public and is located on a site consisting of at least 10 contiguous acres containing one or more parcels of real property owned by the licensee or leased by the licensee, or a combination of parcels owned by the licensee and leased by the licensee.

The holder of a beverage dispensary license or a beverage dispensary tourism license who engages in activity for which a large resort endorsement is required under this section without an endorsement under this section commits the offense of unendorsed large resort service.

The holder of a large resort endorsement who fails to comply with the requirements of (c) — (g) of this section commits the offense of large resort endorsement noncompliance.

Unendorsed large resort service is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $500.00

Large resort endorsement noncompliance is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.450.
Restaurant endorsement.

A restaurant endorsement authorizes the holder of a beverage dispensary license, fair license, golf course license, sporting activity or event license, club license, outdoor recreation lodge license, destination resort license, or beverage dispensary tourism license to allow a person

under 21 years of age access as provided in (e) of this section to the premises of a bona fide restaurant on the licensed premises; and

to enter or remain on the licensed premises to consume food or nonalcoholic beverages as authorized under AS 04.16.010(c)(5).

The biennial fee for a restaurant endorsement is $200.

An application for a restaurant endorsement must specify the establishment or portion of the establishment that constitutes a bona fide restaurant.

The board may issue an endorsement under this section only if the board finds

that the establishment or portion of the establishment for which the endorsement is requested is a bona fide restaurant;

there is supervision on the premises adequate to reasonably ensure that a person under 21 years of age will not obtain alcoholic beverages; and

that it is unlikely that persons under 21 years of age not employed on the premises will enter and remain on the premises of the bona fide restaurant for purposes other than dining.

The board may authorize the holder of a license with a restaurant endorsement

to allow a person who is at least 16 years of age but under 21 years of age to enter and remain on the licensed premises for dining only;

to allow a person who is under 16 years of age to enter and remain on the licensed premises for dining only if

the person is accompanied by a person who is 21 years of age or older; and

the parent or guardian of the person consents to the person being on the licensed premises; and

subject to AS

04.16.049

, to employ or permit the employment of a person who is at least 16 years of age but under 21 years of age on the premises of the bona fide restaurant if the employer provides adequate supervision to ensure that the person does not obtain alcoholic beverages.

The holder of a license who engages in activity under this section without an endorsement under this section commits the offense of unendorsed restaurant service.

The holder of a restaurant endorsement who engages in activity not authorized by the board under (e) of this section or fails to comply with the requirements of (e) of this section commits the offense of restaurant endorsement noncompliance.

Unendorsed restaurant service is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $500.00

Restaurant endorsement noncompliance is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.460.
Package store shipping endorsement.

A package store shipping endorsement authorizes the holder of a package store license to sell alcoholic beverages to a person who makes an order to that licensee for shipment.

The biennial fee for a package store shipping endorsement is $200.

An endorsement holder may ship alcoholic beverages only to the purchaser and may ship alcoholic beverages only in response to an order. The endorsement holder may not, in response to an order, ship alcohol to a purchaser at an address other than the address where the purchaser resides or, if the purchaser resides in a municipality or established village that has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491(a)(1)

, (2), or (3) or (b)(1) or (2) for which a community delivery site has been designated under AS

04.11.491(f)

, to an address other than that community delivery site except as provided by AS

04.11.491(f)

(1) and (2).

An endorsement holder shall provide written or electronic information on fetal alcohol syndrome and fetal alcohol effects resulting from a woman’s consumption of alcohol during pregnancy to the purchaser in response to an order.

If a shipment is to an area that has restricted the sale of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.491(a)(1)

, (2), or (3) or (b)(1) or (2), an endorsement holder may not ship to a purchaser more than 10.5 liters of distilled spirits or 24 liters or more of wine, or either a half-barrel keg of brewed beverages or 12 gallons or more of brewed beverages in individual containers in a calendar month, or a lower amount of distilled spirits, wine, or brewed beverages if the municipality or established village has adopted the lower amount by local option under AS

04.11.491(g)

. Before shipping alcohol to a purchaser in a restricted area, an endorsement holder shall consult the database maintained by the board under AS

04.06.095

for any alcoholic beverage shipments made to the purchaser during that calendar month by a package store. An endorsement holder may not ship an amount of alcoholic beverages to a purchaser in a restricted area that, when added to the amount already shipped, exceeds the amount authorized by this subsection. An endorsement holder shall immediately enter into the database the date and the amount of alcoholic beverages shipped to the purchaser.

An endorsement holder may not divide or combine shipments of alcoholic beverages so as to circumvent the limitation imposed under (e) of this section.

In this section, “endorsement holder” means the holder of a package store license with a package store shipping endorsement, and an agent or employee of the holder of a package store license with a package store shipping endorsement.

The holder of a package store license who ships alcoholic beverages without an endorsement under this section commits the offense of unendorsed package store shipping.

The holder of a package store shipping endorsement who fails to comply with the requirements of (c) — (f) of this section commits the offense of package store shipping endorsement noncompliance.

Unendorsed package store shipping is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $500.

Package store shipping endorsement noncompliance is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.470.
Package store delivery endorsement.

A package store delivery endorsement authorizes the holder of a package store license to deliver alcoholic beverages to the location of a social event as set out in this section. For purposes of this subsection, the board shall define by regulation the term “social event.”

The biennial fee for a package store delivery endorsement is $200.

The holder of a package store delivery endorsement may deliver alcoholic beverages only in response to an order. The board shall adopt regulations specifying the occasions for which delivery of alcoholic beverages is allowed and the manner of delivery by the licensee.

The holder of a package store delivery endorsement may deliver alcoholic beverages only to a responsible adult at the delivery location specified on the order. The responsible adult shall provide identification and acceptable proof of age under AS

04.21.050

and acknowledge in writing receipt of the alcoholic beverages.

The holder of a package store license who delivers alcoholic beverages without an endorsement under this section commits the offense of unendorsed package store delivery.

The holder of a package store delivery endorsement who fails to comply with the requirements of (c) and (d) of this section commits the offense of package store delivery endorsement noncompliance.

Unendorsed package store delivery is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $500.

Package store delivery endorsement noncompliance is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.480.
Package store repackaging endorsement.

A package store repackaging endorsement authorizes the holder of a package store license to subdivide and sell alcoholic beverages from original packages with federally compliant labels to smaller containers with the standard federal government warnings and the product name.

The biennial fee for a package store repackaging endorsement is $200.

A package store licensee with a package store repackaging endorsement may

subdivide alcoholic beverages

for sale on the licensed premises by opening the original package for the purpose of subdividing the contents into smaller packages; or

in response to a purchase request from a person who is on the licensed premises or purchase order submitted in accordance with AS

04.09.470(c)

;

permit an agent or employee to subdivide alcoholic beverages, but may not permit a customer or another person who is not an agent or employee of the licensee to subdivide alcoholic beverages.

The holder of a package store license who repackages alcoholic beverages without an endorsement under this section commits the offense of unendorsed package store repackaging.

The holder of a package store repackaging endorsement who fails to comply with the requirements of this section commits the offense of package store repackaging endorsement noncompliance.

Unendorsed package store repackaging is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $500.

Package store repackaging endorsement noncompliance is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.490.
Package store sampling endorsement.

A package store sampling endorsement authorizes the holder of a package store license to offer for consumption on the licensed premises at no charge a small sample of an alcoholic beverage from its inventory during the package store’s stated hours of business, but not between the hours of midnight and 8:00 a.m.

The biennial fee for a package store sampling endorsement is $200.

Only the license holder or an agent or employee of the license holder may serve a sample.

The holder of a package store sampling endorsement may serve a total volume of samples to a person on a licensed premises each day that does not exceed

12 ounces of beer or mead or cider, if the mead or cider contains less than 8.5 percent alcohol by volume;

six ounces of wine, sake, or mead or cider, if the mead or cider contains 8.5 percent or more alcohol by volume;

1.5 ounces of distilled spirits; or

the alcoholic equivalent of (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection.

The holder of a package store sampling endorsement may not publicly advertise, including through printed news, radio, or television, sampling activities conducted under the endorsement. However, the holder of a package store sampling endorsement may notify existing customers of sampling activities, including by electronic means.

A person who offers a sample of an alcoholic beverage for consumption on the licensed premises of a package store without an endorsement under this section commits the offense of unendorsed package store sampling.

Unendorsed package store sampling is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $500.

The holder of a package store sampling endorsement who fails to comply with the requirements of (a) and (c) — (e) of this section commits the offense of failure to comply with the terms of a package store sampling endorsement.

Failure to comply with the terms of a package store sampling endorsement is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.500.
Bowling alley endorsement.

A bowling alley endorsement authorizes the holder of a beverage dispensary license or a beverage dispensary tourism license to sell or serve alcoholic beverages in the concourse or lane areas of the bowling alley adjacent to the main bar area.

The biennial fee for a bowling alley endorsement is $200.

The board may issue a bowling alley endorsement only if the concourse or lane areas of the bowling alley or both are

designated as part of the licensed premises for the beverage dispensary license or a beverage dispensary tourism license; and

adjacent to the main bar area.

Notwithstanding AS

04.16.049

, the board may, upon application, authorize access by persons under 21 years of age to the concourse or lane areas or both that are designated part of the licensed premises of the bowling alley during hours when no alcoholic beverages are being sold, served, or consumed.

The periods during which persons under 21 years of age may be permitted access to the licensed premises must be clearly posted on the licensed premises.

The holder of a beverage dispensary license or a beverage dispensary tourism license who sells or serves alcoholic beverages in the concourse or lane areas of a bowling alley without an endorsement under this section commits the offense of unendorsed bowling alley service.

The holder of a bowling alley endorsement under this section who fails to comply with the requirements of (e) of this section or who permits access by a person under 21 years of age to the concourse or lane areas of the bowling alley during hours when alcoholic beverages are being served in the concourse or lane areas commits the offense of bowling alley endorsement noncompliance.

Unendorsed bowling alley service is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $500.

Bowling alley endorsement noncompliance is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.510.
Golf course endorsement.

A golf course endorsement authorizes the owner of a golf course who has obtained a beverage dispensary license or a beverage dispensary tourism license to sell or serve alcoholic beverages on the golf course, driving range, club house and other buildings located on the course, and a vending cart carrying beverages or food to, from, or on the course, excluding the parking lot.

The biennial fee for a golf course endorsement is $200.

An application for a golf course endorsement must include a drawing of the golf course with an annotated illustration and a description of the portions of the course that are licensed premises and that are intended to be covered by the endorsement.

The holder of a beverage dispensary license or beverage dispensary tourism license who sells or serves alcoholic beverages on a golf course without an endorsement under this section commits the offense of unendorsed golf course service.

The holder of a golf course endorsement who fails to comply with (a) of this section commits the offense of golf course endorsement noncompliance.

Unendorsed golf course service is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $500.00

Golf course endorsement noncompliance is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.520.
Brewery repackaging endorsement.

A brewery repackaging endorsement authorizes the holder of a brewery manufacturer license who held a license to operate a brewpub under former AS

04.11.135

and was operating a brewpub on the day before the effective date of this section and who also holds, wholly or in part, a beverage dispensary license, beverage dispensary tourism license, restaurant or eating place license, or a seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license to offer the holder’s brewed beverages for sale for consumption off the licensed premises and to subdivide and sell the holder’s brewed beverages from original packages with federally compliant labels to smaller containers with the standard federal government warnings and the product name.

The biennial fee for a brewery repackaging endorsement is $200.

A brewery manufacturer licensee with a brewery repackaging endorsement

is authorized to sell, each day, to a person on the licensed premises for consumption off the licensed premises, not more than 5.167 gallons of the holder’s beer or sake;

may permit an agent or employee to subdivide the holder’s brewed beverages, but may not permit a customer or another person who is not an agent or employee of the licensee to subdivide the holder’s brewed beverages.

In this section, “licensed premises” means a premises licensed under a beverage dispensary license, beverage dispensary tourism license, restaurant or eating place license, or a seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license that is controlled by a brewery manufacturer licensee.

The holder of a brewery manufacturer license who repackages brewed beverages without an endorsement under this section or a brewery retail license under AS

04.09.320

commits the offense of unendorsed brewery repackaging.

The holder of a brewery repackaging endorsement who fails to comply with the requirements of this section commits the offense of brewery repackaging endorsement noncompliance.

Unendorsed brewery repackaging is a violation, punishable by a fine of $500.00

Brewery repackaging endorsement noncompliance is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)